Indiana, session 2026, HB1262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-19-3-39 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 39. (a) Not later than October 1, 2026, the
department shall do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes information and, as
applicable, recommendations regarding the following:
(A) Indiana's kindergarten through grade 12 civics
education curriculum and practice.
(B) Work based learning, co-curricular, and
extracurricular civics education initiatives.
(C) Assessments that are used to evaluate a student's
preparedness to understand, monitor, and interact with
local, state, and federal government operations.
(D) Longitudinal methodologies to evaluate the
effectiveness of Indiana's civics based curriculum,
initiatives, and assessments in preparing students for
Indiana citizenship.
2026 IN 1262—LS 6870/DI 110


(2) Submit the report prepared under subdivision (1) to the
general assembly in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) In preparing the report under subsection (a)(1), the
department shall consult with and consider the perspectives and
opinions of stakeholders, including the following:
(1) Indiana based organizations dedicated to civics education.
(2) Educators responsible for civics instruction in schools in
Indiana.
(3) Both elected and appointed officials at the state and local
levels in all branches of government.
(c) The department may contract with a third party to prepare
the report required under this section.
(d) This section expires January 1, 2027.
2026 IN 1262—LS 6870/DI 110